Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.060

Applicant requirements.

An applicant for an athletic trainer license must:

(1) Have received a bachelor's or advanced degree from an accredited four-year college or university that meets the academic standards of athletic training, accepted by the secretary, as advised by the committee;

(2) Have successfully completed an examination administered or approved by the secretary, in consultation with the committee; and

(3) Submit an application on forms prescribed by the secretary and pay the licensure fee required under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 253 s 7.]